extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/unit/data/morph.dic
9
drink/S	po:noun
drink/RQ	po:verb	al:drank	al:drunk	ts:present
drank	po:verb	st:drink	is:past_1
drunk	po:verb	st:drink	is:past_2
eat/RQ	po:verb	al:ate	al:eaten	ts:present
ate	po:verb	st:eat	is:past_1
eaten	po:verb	st:eat	is:past_2
phenomenon	po:noun	al:phenomena
phenomena	po:noun st:phenomenon	is:plur
